Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-607
Dogs; running at large; penalty.

The owner of any
dog running at large for ten days without a collar as required in section
54-605 shall be fined an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars.

Laws 1877, § 7, p. 157;

R.S.1913, § 178;

C.S.1922, § 175;

C.S.1929, § 54-607;

R.S.1943, § 54-607;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 8.